Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
CHAPTER 433 Offenses Against Property by Force

433.010.
Arson. [Repealed.]

433.020.
Maliciously burning building other than a dwelling. [Repealed.]

433.030.
Maliciously burning property other than a building. [Repealed.]

433.040.
Burning personal property to defraud insurer. [Repealed.]

433.050.
Maliciously attempting to burn property — What constitutes attempt. [Repealed.]

433.060.
Intentionally burning field of another. [Repealed.]

433.070.
Unlawfully firing weeds, grass, capable of spreading. [Repealed.]

433.080.
Negligently firing woods and damaging property. [Repealed.]

433.090.
Fire in wooded area, near road; failure to keep under control and extinguish. [Repealed.]

433.100.
Destroying fire prevention posters. [Repealed.]

433.110.
Damaging fire prevention equipment. [Repealed.]

433.120.
Robbery — Burglary — Possession of burglarious tools. [Repealed.]

433.130.
Burglary of bank or safe. [Repealed.]

433.140.
Armed robbery or burglary. [Repealed.]

433.150.
Armed assault with intent to rob. [Repealed.]

433.160.
Aiding or comforting robber or burglar. [Repealed.]

433.170.
Robbery or larceny of certain instruments. [Repealed.]

433.180.
Stealing from public building — Robbing person in house — Housebreaking. [Repealed.]

433.190.
Breaking warehouse, storehouse, shop or room in boat with intent to steal. [Repealed.]

433.200.
Breaking railroad station or car with intent to kill or steal. [Repealed.]

433.210.
Opening or appropriating property in possession of a common carrier. [Repealed.]

433.220.
Grand larceny — Taking of vehicle without consent of owner. [Repealed.]

433.230.
Petit larceny. [Repealed.]

433.234.
Shoplifting.

Willful concealment of unpurchased merchandise of any store or other mercantile establishment on the premises of such store shall be prima facie evidence of an intent to deprive the owner of his property without paying the purchase price therefor.

All city and county law enforcement agencies shall cause to be made a photograph, a set of fingerprints, and a general descriptive report of all persons except juveniles arrested for theft through an act of shoplifting. If convicted, two (2) copies of each item shall be forwarded within thirty (30) days to the Department of Kentucky State Police of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 11, § 1; 1968, ch. 49, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(3); 1974, ch. 406, § 318; 2007, ch. 85, § 315, effective June 26, 2007.

433.236.
Detention and arrest of shoplifting suspect.

A peace officer, security agent of a mercantile establishment, merchant or merchant’s employee who has probable cause for believing that goods held for sale by the merchant have been unlawfully taken by a person may take the person into custody and detain him in a reasonable manner for a reasonable length of time, on the premises of the mercantile establishment or off the premises of the mercantile establishment, if the persons enumerated in this section are in fresh pursuit, for any or all of the following purposes:

To request identification;

To verify such identification;

To make reasonable inquiry as to whether such person has in his possession unpurchased merchandise, and to make reasonable investigation of the ownership of such merchandise;

To recover or attempt to recover goods taken from the mercantile establishment by such person, or by others accompanying him;

To inform a peace officer or law enforcement agency of the detention of the person and to surrender the person to the custody of a peace officer, and in the case of a minor, to inform the parents, guardian, or other person having custody of that minor of his detention, in addition to surrendering the minor to the custody of a peace officer.

The recovery of goods taken from the mercantile establishment by the person detained or by others shall not limit the right of the persons named in subsection (1) of this section to detain such person for peace officers or otherwise accomplish the purposes of subsection (1).

Any peace officer may arrest without warrant any person he has probable cause for believing has committed larceny in retail or wholesale establishments.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 11, § 2; 1968, ch. 49, § 2; 1978, ch. 75, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

433.240.
Taking or damaging property unlawfully but without felonious intent. [Repealed.]

433.250.
Stealing cattle — Hog — Fowl. [Repealed.]

433.255.
Governor may offer reward for apprehension and conviction of livestock thief.

When in any community of the state there have been repeated or aggravated instances of larceny of livestock, the Governor may offer a reward for the apprehension and conviction of any person guilty of larceny of livestock, as defined in KRS

446.010

, in such community, and in his or her discretion may employ detectives, not exceeding two (2) at any one (1) time, for the ferreting out, apprehension, and conviction of any offender. The reward may be in any sum fixed by the Governor, not exceeding $1,000. The Governor shall by executive proclamation designate the boundaries of the community to which the reward shall apply. The reward shall be paid out of the Governor’s general emergency fund.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 163, § 1, effective June 19, 1952; 2017 ch. 129, § 29, effective June 29, 2017.

433.260.
Cutting and taking timber. [Repealed.]

433.270.
Unlawfully mining or removing coal. [Repealed.]

433.280.
Taking or destroying tobacco plants. [Repealed.]

433.290.
Receiving stolen property. [Repealed.]

433.300.
Receiving property pertaining to military establishment of state. [Repealed.]

433.310.
Enticing another to breach contract to labor. [Repealed.]

433.320.
Wilfully damaging watercraft. [Repealed.]

433.330.
Maliciously damaging salt works. [Repealed.]

433.340.
Damaging levee. [Repealed.]

433.350.
Damaging state-operated bridge or ferry. [Repealed.]

433.360.
Damaging railway, lock, dam or bridge. [Repealed.]

433.370.
Hindering transportation by violence. [Repealed.]

433.380.
Hindering transportation by coercion, intimidation, trespass. [Repealed.]

433.390.
Displacing or damaging railroad track, switch, bridge. [Repealed.]

433.395.
Trespass upon posted railroad property — Liability of parent for knowingly permitting trespass by child — Exceptions. [Repealed.]

433.400.
Unlawfully tampering with railroad car or locomotive — Uncoupling train. [Repealed.]

433.410.
Interfering with interurban electric railroad — Damaging reservoir. [Repealed.]

433.420.
Wilfully obstructing street railroad. [Repealed.]

433.430.
Interfering with communications. [Repealed.]

433.440.
Wilfully obstructing road. [Repealed.]

433.450.
Removal of injurious substance from highway. [Repealed.]

433.460.
Wilfully causing explosion on another’s property. [Repealed.]

433.470.
Supplier of dynamite to keep register. [Repealed.]

433.480.
Wilfully damaging public building. [Repealed.]

433.490.
Fines for trespass on or injury to public property of the state or a county. [Repealed.]

433.500.
Damaging state capitols or office buildings — Creating nuisance. [Repealed.]

433.510.
Grazing livestock on capitol grounds. [Repealed.]

433.520.
Wrongfully converting electric current; tampering with meter. [Repealed.]

433.521.
Wrongful conversion of water, electricity or gas — Tampering with meter. [Repealed.]

433.522.
Damaging meter, conduit or other apparatus. [Repealed.]

433.523.
Possession of contrivance for tampering with meter. [Repealed.]

433.524.
Knowingly receiving benefit of water, electricity or gas wrongfully diverted. [Repealed.]

433.525.
Indictment may embrace several acts. [Repealed.]

433.530.
Injuring electrical machinery. [Repealed.]

433.531.
Manufacture, use, possession, transportation or transfer of equipment for theft of telecommunication service. [Repealed.]

433.533.
Equipment for theft of telecommunication service — Search warrant for — Destruction. [Repealed.]

433.540.
Possession of contrivance to tamper with meter. [Repealed.]

433.550.
Knowingly receiving benefit of current wrongfully diverted. [Repealed.]

433.560.
Indictment may embrace several acts. [Repealed.]

433.570.
Wrongfully converting water; tampering with meter. [Repealed.]

433.580.
Damaging meter, pipe, conduit, hydrant. [Repealed.]

433.590.
Possession of contrivance to tamper with meter. [Repealed.]

433.600.
Knowingly receiving benefit of water wrongfully diverted. [Repealed.]

433.610.
Indictment may embrace several acts. [Repealed.]

433.615.
Tampering with parking meter, coin telephone or vending machine — Possession of key or device designed to open same. [Repealed.]

433.620.
Tampering with vehicle. [Repealed.]

433.630.
Damaging or removing part of vehicle. [Repealed.]

433.640.
Defacing or altering motor vehicle or farm tractor serial number. [Repealed.]

433.650.
Disinterring human body. [Repealed.]

433.660.
Violating graves. [Repealed.]

433.670.
Permitting livestock to graze in graveyard. [Repealed.]

433.680.
Damaging literary work in public custody. [Repealed.]

433.690.
Wrongfully entering park — Injuring deer, elk or buffalo. [Repealed.]

433.700.
Shooting, hunting or fishing on land of another. [Repealed.]

433.710.
Fishing in or destroying private fish pond. [Repealed.]

433.720.
Trespassing — Liabilities of hunters and landowners. [Repealed.]

433.730.
Leaving gate open or removing fence — Stealing fruit or vegetables. [Repealed.]

433.740.
Destroying or damaging trees — Quarrying stone — Damaging vegetables or fence. [Repealed.]

433.750.
Injuring public property or right-of-way.

Any person who picks, pulls, digs, tears up, cuts, breaks, burns or otherwise damages any tree, shrub, flower, vine, bush or turf on the right of way of any state highway or county road or upon any land set aside, dedicated or maintained by this state as a public park or as a refuge or sanctuary for wild animals, birds or fish, without having first obtained permission in writing of the engineer having charge of the maintenance of the highway, or the superintendent or custodian of the park, refuge or sanctuary shall be fined not less than $25 nor more than $300.

History.

1257-1: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 178, § 2; 1960, ch. 49, § 1; 1966, ch. 23, § 76.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

The amendment of this section by Acts 1960, ch. 49 was declared inconsistent with Acts 1960, ch. 178, § 2 by the Reviser and, was repealed by Acts 1966, ch. 255, § 283.

433.753.
Criminal littering on public highway — Rewards for information.

When any paper, waste material, litter, or other refuse is thrown or dropped from a motor vehicle, the operator thereof shall be deemed prima facie to be guilty of criminal littering.

It shall be the duty of the Department of Kentucky State Police, county sheriffs and police officers, solid waste coordinators appointed by a county or waste management district, city police officers, and all other law enforcement and peace officers within their respective jurisdictions, to enforce the criminal littering laws and the provisions of KRS

224.40-100

.

Any city or county may offer and pay rewards for the giving of information leading to the arrest and conviction of any person, firm, or corporation for commission of the offense of criminal littering.

Violators may prepay to the Circuit Court clerk if prepayment is so noted on the citation and if the littering offense is not combined with an offense that is not prepayable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 77; 1974, ch. 406, § 332; 2002, ch. 342, § 8, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 316, effective June 26, 2007.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A forest warden may act as a peace officer for the protection of the forests of the state by enforcing this section and KRS

433.757

, but he may not act as a peace officer in enforcing these laws if the littering is not directly related to the protection of the forests of the state.

OAG 70-550

.

To the extent that a fiscal court cannot agree not to enforce the laws regarding the littering of public highways, a contract whereby a coal company would pay a fee to the county, based on the tonnage hauled, to compensate for future expected damages to county roads would be impermissible.

OAG 76-170

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Criminal littering, KRS

512.070

.

Removal of injurious substance from highway, KRS

189.754

.

433.757.
Littering public waters — Reward for information.

When any litter as defined in KRS

512.010

is thrown or dropped from a motorboat or vessel as defined in KRS

235.010

, the operator thereof shall be deemed prima facie to have violated KRS

512.070

.

It shall be the duty of officers of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources as provided in KRS

235.010

and KRS Chapter 150 and all other law enforcement and peace officers of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions and solid waste coordinators to enforce the provisions of KRS

512.070

.

Any city or county may offer and pay rewards for the giving of information leading to the arrest and conviction of any person, firm, or corporation for a violation of KRS

512.070

.

Violators may prepay to the Circuit Court clerk if prepayment is so noted on the citation and if the littering offense is not combined with an offense that is not prepayable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 78; 1972, ch. 273, § 7; 1974, ch. 292, § 25; 1974, ch. 406, § 323; 1998, ch. 23, § 17, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 342, § 9, effective July 15, 2002.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A forest warden may act as a peace officer for the protection of the forests of the state by enforcing KRS

433.753

and this section, but he may not act as a peace officer in enforcing these laws if the littering is not directly related to the protection of the forests of the state.

OAG 70-550

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Criminal littering, KRS

512.010

,

512.070

.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Bratt and Brown, Environmental Law, 70 Ky. L.J. 455 (1981-82).

433.760.
Damaging bridge, guideboard, road, ditch, monument or bench. [Repealed.]

433.770.
Willfully removing or damaging boundary marker.

Any person who fraudulently and willfully removes, defaces, cuts down, or destroys a cornertree, post, cornerstone, or any monument erected to designate the boundary of this state, or of any county or city, or the boundary of any tract or lot of land, shall be guilty of a Class D felony and shall cause the marker, at his or her own expense, to be reestablished by a professional land surveyor.

Any person who willfully and knowingly, but without a felonious intent, removes, defaces, cuts down, or destroys a tree, post, stone, or any monument erected to designate the boundaries of this state or of any county or city, or the boundaries of any tract or lot of land, shall cause the marker, at his or her own expense, to be reestablished by a professional land surveyor.

History.

1228, 1256: amend. Acts 1992, ch. 463, § 46, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 214, § 42, effective January 1, 1999.

433.780.
Occupant of shanty boat landing on private premises. [Repealed.]

433.790.
Occupant of shanty boat stealing from private premises. [Repealed.]

433.800.
Altering or defacing brands. [Repealed.]

433.810.
Injuring, poisoning or killing cattle. [Repealed.]

433.820.
Attempting to poison honey bees. [Repealed.]

433.830.
Killing or wounding pet deer. [Repealed.]

433.840.
Injuring homing or carrier pigeon. [Repealed.]

433.850.
Railroad engineer killing or crippling livestock. [Repealed.]

433.860.
Erecting or maintaining spite fence. [Repealed.]

433.865.
Theft of dairy equipment.

A person is guilty of theft of milk cases, cabinets, or other dairy equipment by unlawful taking or disposition when he:

Receives, takes, stores, buys, sells, disposes of, uses, or otherwise possesses any milk case, milk cabinet, or other dairy equipment without the consent of the owner;

Refuses to return any milk case, cabinet, or other dairy equipment to the owner upon demand; or

Defaces, erases, obliterates, covers up, or otherwise removes or conceals any name, registered trademark, or other business identification of an owner of a milk case, cabinet, or other dairy equipment for the purpose of destroying or removing from the milk case, cabinet, or other dairy equipment evidence of its ownership.

Theft of milk cases, cabinets, or other dairy equipment is punishable by a minimum fine of one hundred dollars ($100) and a maximum fine of three hundred dollars ($300).

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 305, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

433.870.
Defacing or carrying away formation in cave exhibited to public. [Repealed.]